test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VV_makomii_gt-norm.yaml
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: omakomiimishing
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Obv: omakomiimishan
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: omakomiimishan
     X+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: imakomiimishing
     X+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Obv: imakomiimishan
     X+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: imakomiimishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pret: nimakomiiminaaniban
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+1Pl+VocPl: [nimakomiiminaanidig, nimakomiiminaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+21+Pret: gimakomiiminaaniban
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+21+VocPl: [gimakomiiminaanidig, gimakomiiminaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pret: gimakomiimiwaaban
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+2Pl+VocPl: [gimakomiimiwaadig, gimakomiimiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pret: omakomiiminiiban
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Obv+VocPl: [omakomiiminiidig, omakomiiminiidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pret: omakomiimiwaaban
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Pl+VocPl: [omakomiimiwaadig, omakomiimiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+1Pl+Loc: nimakomiiminaaning
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+1Pl+Obv: nimakomiiminaanin
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pl: nimakomiiminaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+21+Loc: gimakomiiminaaning
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+21+Obv: gimakomiiminaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+21+Pl: gimakomiiminaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+2Pl+Loc: gimakomiimiwaang
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+2Pl+Obv: gimakomiimiwaan
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pl: gimakomiimiwaan
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Obv+Loc: omakomiiminiing
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Obv+Obv: omakomiiminiin
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pl: omakomiiminiin
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Pl+Loc: omakomiimiwaang
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Pl+Obv: omakomiimiwaan
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pl: omakomiimiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+Pret+Loc: nimakomiimibaniing
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+Pret+Obv: nimakomiimibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+Pret+Pl: nimakomiimibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Pret+Loc: gimakomiimibaniing
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Pret+Obv: gimakomiimibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Pret+Pl: gimakomiimibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pret+Loc: omakomiimibaniing
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pret+Obv: omakomiimibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pret+Pl: omakomiimibaniin
     X+makomii+NI+Pos+Pret+Loc: imakomiimibaniing
     X+makomii+NI+Pos+Pret+Obv: imakomiimibaniin
     X+makomii+NI+Pos+Pret+Pl: imakomiimibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nimakomiishinaaniban
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nimakomiishinaanidig, nimakomiishinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+21+Pret: gimakomiishinaaniban
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+21+VocPl: [gimakomiishinaanidig, gimakomiishinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gimakomiishiwaaban
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gimakomiishiwaadig, gimakomiishiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pret: omakomiishiniiban
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [omakomiishiniidig, omakomiishiniidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pret: omakomiishiwaaban
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [omakomiishiwaadig, omakomiishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nimakomiishinaaning
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nimakomiishinaanin
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nimakomiishinaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+21+Loc: gimakomiishinaaning
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+21+Obv: gimakomiishinaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+21+Pl: gimakomiishinaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gimakomiishiwaang
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gimakomiishiwaan
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gimakomiishiwaan
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Obv+Loc: omakomiishiniing
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Obv+Obv: omakomiishiniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pl: omakomiishiniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Pl+Loc: omakomiishiwaang
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Pl+Obv: omakomiishiwaan
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pl: omakomiishiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: nimakomiishibaniing
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: nimakomiishibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: nimakomiishibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: gimakomiishibaniing
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: gimakomiishibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: gimakomiishibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: omakomiishibaniing
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: omakomiishibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: omakomiishibaniin
     X+makomii+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: imakomiishibaniing
     X+makomii+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: imakomiishibaniin
     X+makomii+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: imakomiishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+makomii+NI+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimakomiinaanibaniing
     1+makomii+NI+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimakomiinaanibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimakomiinaanibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nimakomiinaanidig, nimakomiinaanidog]
     1+makomii+NI+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nimakomiinaanidig, nimakomiinaanidog]
     1+makomii+NI+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nimakomiinaanidig, nimakomiinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+21+Pret+Loc: gimakomiinaanibaniing
     2+makomii+NI+21+Pret+Obv: gimakomiinaanibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+21+Pret+Pl: gimakomiinaanibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+21+VocPl+Loc: [gimakomiinaanidig, gimakomiinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimakomiinaanidig, gimakomiinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimakomiinaanidig, gimakomiinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimakomiiwaabaniing
     2+makomii+NI+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimakomiiwaabaniin
     2+makomii+NI+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimakomiiwaabaniin
     2+makomii+NI+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimakomiiwaadig, gimakomiiwaadog]
     2+makomii+NI+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimakomiiwaadig, gimakomiiwaadog]
     2+makomii+NI+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimakomiiwaadig, gimakomiiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omakomiiniibaniing
     3+makomii+NI+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omakomiiniibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omakomiiniibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omakomiiniidig, omakomiiniidog]
     3+makomii+NI+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omakomiiniidig, omakomiiniidog]
     3+makomii+NI+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omakomiiniidig, omakomiiniidog]
     3+makomii+NI+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omakomiiwaabaniing
     3+makomii+NI+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omakomiiwaabaniin
     3+makomii+NI+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omakomiiwaabaniin
     3+makomii+NI+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omakomiiwaadig, omakomiiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omakomiiwaadig, omakomiiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omakomiiwaadig, omakomiiwaadog]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     makomii+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: makomiinyishibaniing
     makomii+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: makomiinyishibaniin
     makomii+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: makomiinyishibaniin
     makomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: makomiinsishibaniing
     makomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: makomiinsishibaniin
     makomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: makomiinsishibaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nimakomiinyimishinaan
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nimakomiinsimishinaan
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21: gimakomiinyimishinaan
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gimakomiinyimishiwaa
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21: gimakomiinsimishinaan
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gimakomiinsimishiwaa
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv: omakomiinyimishini
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl: omakomiinyimishiwaa
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv: omakomiinsimishini
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl: omakomiinsimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: nimakomiinyimishiban
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [nimakomiinyimishidig, nimakomiinyimishidog]
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: nimakomiinsimishiban
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [nimakomiinsimishidig, nimakomiinsimishidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: gimakomiinyimishiban
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [gimakomiinyimishidig, gimakomiinyimishidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: gimakomiinsimishiban
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [gimakomiinsimishidig, gimakomiinsimishidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: omakomiinyimishiban
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [omakomiinyimishidig, omakomiinyimishidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: omakomiinsimishiban
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [omakomiinsimishidig, omakomiinsimishidog]
     X+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: imakomiinyimishiban
     X+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [imakomiinyimishidig, imakomiinyimishidog]
     X+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: imakomiinsimishiban
     X+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [imakomiinsimishidig, imakomiinsimishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: nimakomiinyimishing
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: nimakomiinyimishan
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: nimakomiinyimishan
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: nimakomiinsimishing
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: nimakomiinsimishan
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: nimakomiinsimishan
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: gimakomiinyimishing
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: gimakomiinyimishan
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: gimakomiinyimishan
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: gimakomiinsimishing
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: gimakomiinsimishan
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: gimakomiinsimishan
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: omakomiinyimishing
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: omakomiinyimishan
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: omakomiinyimishan
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: omakomiinsimishing
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: omakomiinsimishan
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: omakomiinsimishan
     X+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: imakomiinyimishing
     X+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: imakomiinyimishan
     X+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: imakomiinyimishan
     X+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: imakomiinsimishing
     X+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: imakomiinsimishan
     X+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: imakomiinsimishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+Pret: nimakomiinyiminaaniban
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+VocPl: [nimakomiinyiminaanidig, nimakomiinyiminaanidog]
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Pret: nimakomiinsiminaaniban
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+VocPl: [nimakomiinsiminaanidig, nimakomiinsiminaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+21+Pret: gimakomiinyiminaaniban
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+21+VocPl: [gimakomiinyiminaanidig, gimakomiinyiminaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+2Pl+Pret: gimakomiinyimiwaaban
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+2Pl+VocPl: [gimakomiinyimiwaadig, gimakomiinyimiwaadog]
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+21+Pret: gimakomiinsiminaaniban
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+21+VocPl: [gimakomiinsiminaanidig, gimakomiinsiminaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+2Pl+Pret: gimakomiinsimiwaaban
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+2Pl+VocPl: [gimakomiinsimiwaadig, gimakomiinsimiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+3Obv+Pret: omakomiinyiminiiban
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+3Obv+VocPl: [omakomiinyiminiidig, omakomiinyiminiidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+3Pl+Pret: omakomiinyimiwaaban
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+3Pl+VocPl: [omakomiinyimiwaadig, omakomiinyimiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+3Obv+Pret: omakomiinsiminiiban
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+3Obv+VocPl: [omakomiinsiminiidig, omakomiinsiminiidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+3Pl+Pret: omakomiinsimiwaaban
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+3Pl+VocPl: [omakomiinsimiwaadig, omakomiinsimiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+Loc: nimakomiinyiminaaning
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+Obv: nimakomiinyiminaanin
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+Pl: nimakomiinyiminaanin
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Loc: nimakomiinsiminaaning
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Obv: nimakomiinsiminaanin
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Pl: nimakomiinsiminaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+21+Loc: gimakomiinyiminaaning
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+21+Obv: gimakomiinyiminaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+21+Pl: gimakomiinyiminaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+2Pl+Loc: gimakomiinyimiwaang
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+2Pl+Obv: gimakomiinyimiwaan
